Illinois, session 104th, SB614.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois Human Rights Act is amended by 5changing Section 1-101 as follows: 6    (775 ILCS 5/1-101)  (from Ch. 68, par. 1-101)7    Sec. 1-101. Short Title. This Act shall be known and and 8may be cited as the Illinois Human Rights Act.9(Source: P.A. 81-1216.)